en: Cowbell mounting method: Bracket mount; Eye-bolt mount (requires clamp); Handheld; Integrated clamp mount; Post/rod mount; Other
bg-BG: Метод на монтаж на звънеца: Монтаж на стойка; Монтаж с ухо (изисква скоба); Ръчен; Монтаж с вградена скоба; Монтаж на прът/щифт; Други
es: Método de montaje de cencerro: Montaje con soporte; Soporte de armella (requiere abrazadera); Portátil; Soporte de abrazadera integrado; Soporte de poste/varilla; Otro
de: Befestigungsmethode der Kuhglocke: Halterungsmontage; Ringschraubenmontage (Klemme erforderlich); In der Hand gehalten; Integrierte Klemmenmontage; Stab-/Stangenmontage; Andere
sv: Koskälla fästmetod: Fästmontering; Öglebultsfäste (kräver klämma); Handhållen; Integrerat klämfäste; Stångmontering; Övrigt
lt-LT: Karvės varpo montavimo būdas: Tvirtinimas laikikliu; Tvirtinimas ąsiniu varžtu (reikia spaustuko); Laikoma rankoje; Integruotas spaustuko laikiklis; Tvirtinimas ant stovo / strypo; Kita
pt-BR: Método de montagem do sino: Suporte de montagem; Montagem por olhal (requer braçadeira); Portátil; Montagem com braçadeira integrada; Montagem em haste/pino; Outros
zh-TW: 牛鈴安裝方式: 支架安裝; 環首螺栓安裝 (需夾具); 手持; 整合式夾具安裝; 立柱/桿安裝; 其他
sl-SI: Način montaže kravjega zvonca: Pritrditev z nosilcem; Pritrditev z očesnim vijakom (zahteva spono); Ročno; Pritrditev z vgrajeno spono; Pritrditev na stojalo/palico; Drugo
sk-SK: Spôsob montáže kravského zvonca: Montáž na držiak; Montáž na skrutku s okom (vyžaduje svorku); Do ruky; Montáž pomocou integrovanej svorky; Montáž na tyč/stojan; Iné
it: Metodo di montaggio del campanaccio: Montaggio a staffa; Montaggio con golfare (richiede morsetto); A mano; Montaggio a morsetto integrato; Montaggio su perno/asta; Altro
el: Μέθοδος στήριξης κουδούνας αγελάδας: Βάση στήριξης; Βάση με κρίκο (απαιτεί σφιγκτήρα); Χειρός; Ενσωματωμένη βάση με σφιγκτήρα; Βάση σε στύλο/ράβδο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Metoda de montare a tălăngii: Montare cu suport; Montare cu șurub cu ochi (necesită clemă); De ținut în mână; Montare cu clemă integrată; Montare pe tijă/bară; Altele
th: วิธีการติดตั้งคาวเบลล์: ติดตั้งด้วยแป้นยึด; ติดตั้งด้วยอายโบลต์ (ต้องใช้แคลมป์); ถือด้วยมือ; ติดตั้งแคลมป์ในตัว; ติดตั้งบนเสา/แกน; อื่นๆ
da: Monteringsmetode for koklokke: Beslagmontering; Øjeboltmontering (kræver klemme); Håndholdt; Integreret klemmebeslag; Stang-/rørmontering; Andet
pt-PT: Método de montagem do chocalho: Suporte de fixação; Suporte de olhal (requer braçadeira); De mão; Suporte de braçadeira integrado; Suporte de poste/haste; Outro
ru: Способ крепления коровьего колокольчика: Крепление на кронштейн; Крепление на рым-болт (требуется клемп); Ручной; Встроенное крепление-клемп; Крепление на стойку/стержень; Другое
pl: Metoda mocowania dzwonka krowiego: Uchwyt wspornikowy; Uchwyt z oczkiem (wymaga klampy); Do trzymania w dłoni; Zintegrowany uchwyt zaciskowy; Uchwyt na pręt / trzpień; Inny
fi: Lehmänkellon asennusmenetelmä: Kiinnike; Silmukkapultti (vaatii puristimen); Kädessä pidettävä; Integroitu puristinkiinnike; Tappi-/tankokiinnike; Muu
ko: 카우벨 장착 방식: 브래킷 마운트; 아이볼트 마운트(클램프 필요); 핸드헬드; 통합형 클램프 마운트; 포스트/로드 마운트; 기타
vi: Phương pháp gắn chuông bò: Giá đỡ; Bu lông vòng (cần kẹp); Cầm tay; Ngàm kẹp tích hợp; Cọc/thanh thẳng; Khác
ja: カウベルマウント方法: ブラケットマウント; アイボルトマウント (クランプが必要); ハンドヘルド; 一体型クランプマウント; ポスト / ロッドマウント; その他
zh-CN: 牛铃安装方法: 支架安装; 吊环螺栓安装（需要夹具）; 手持; 一体式夹具安装; 柱/杆安装; 其他
hu: Kolomp rögzítési módja: Konzolos rögzítés; Gyűrűs csavaros rögzítés (bilincset igényel); Kézi; Beépített bilincses rögzítés; Oszlop/rúd rögzítés; Egyéb
tr: Cowbell montaj yöntemi: Braket montajlı; Halkalı cıvata montajlı (kelepçe gerektirir); Elde tutulan; Entegre kelepçe montajlı; Direk/çubuk montajlı; Diğer
cs: Způsob upevnění kravského zvonku: Držák; Uchycení na očko (vyžaduje svorku); Do ruky; Integrovaná svorka; Montáž na tyč/stojan; Ostatní
nb: Monteringsmetode for kubjelle: Brakettmontering; Øyeboltmontering (krever klemme); Håndholdt; Integrert klemmemontering; Stolpe-/stangmontering; Annet
hr-HR: Način montaže kravljeg zvona: Montaža na nosač; Montaža s očnim vijkom (potrebna je stezaljka); Ručno držanje; Montaža s integriranom stezaljkom; Montaža na stalak/šipku; Ostalo
nl: Montagemethode koebel: Beugelbevestiging; Oogboutbevestiging (klem vereist); Handheld; Geïntegreerde klembevestiging; Paal-/stangbevestiging; Overige
fr: Méthode de fixation de la cloche: Support de fixation; Fixation par boulon à œil (nécessite une pince); Tenu à la main; Pince de fixation intégrée; Montage sur tige/poteau; Autre